Utah statutes.
17B-2a-605.   Preferential rights of cities.
(1)  Each city whose area is within a metropolitan water district and that
provides water on a retail level within the district has a preferential right
to purchase from the district a portion of the water served by the district.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided by contract between a metropolitan water
district and the city, the percentage of the total district water supply that
a city has a preferential right to purchase under Subsection (1) is the same
percentage as the total amount of taxes levied by the district against
property within the city's retail water service area is of the total of all
taxes levied by the district against all property within the district.
(3) (a)  Nothing in this section may be construed to limit the ability of a
metropolitan water district to establish preferential rights by contract with
a city that has preferential rights under this section.
(b)  Each agreement described in Subsection (3)(a) entered into before April
30, 2007 is ratified, validated, and confirmed.
